public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
PFX $ N 62 # numeraŧion latina
PFX $ 0 X [LC]
PFX $ 0 L X
PFX $ 0 C [XLCDM]
PFX $ 0 CX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CL X
PFX $ 0 CC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 CCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CCL X
PFX $ 0 CCC [XL]
PFX $ 0 CCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CCCL X
PFX $ 0 CD [XL]
PFX $ 0 CDX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CDL X
PFX $ 0 D [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DX [LC]
PFX $ 0 DL X
PFX $ 0 DC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCL X
PFX $ 0 DCC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCCL X
PFX $ 0 DCCC [XL]
PFX $ 0 DCCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCCCL X
PFX $ 0 CM [XL]
PFX $ 0 CMX [LC]
PFX $ 0 CML X
PFX $ 0 M [XLCDM]
PFX $ 0 MX [LC]
PFX $ 0 ML X
PFX $ 0 MC [XLCMD]
PFX $ 0 MCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCL X
PFX $ 0 MCC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCCL X
PFX $ 0 MCCC [XL]
PFX $ 0 MCCC [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCCC X
PFX $ 0 MCD [XL]
PFX $ 0 MCDX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCDL X
PFX $ 0 MD [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDL X
PFX $ 0 MDC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCL X
PFX $ 0 MDCC [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCL X
PFX $ 0 MDCCC [XL]
PFX $ 0 MDCCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCCL X
PFX $ 0 MCM [XL]
PFX $ 0 MCMX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCML X
PFX $ 0 MM [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MMX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MML X



#PFX d Y 1
#PFX d 0 stra .

#PFX e Y 1
#PFX e 0 pre .
