public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
X/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
XX/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
XXX/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
L/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
C/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
D/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
M/£$Z	po:numeral_latin
